Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1536.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Department of Education shall study the adequacy of assessments ad-
ministered in the public schools of this state. The department shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the
interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education no later than September
15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 147